Utah statutes.
54-18-303.   Application for land use permit.

(1)  Before a public utility may file a land use application for a proposed high voltage power line, the public utility shall, in accordance with Subsection (2), identify a proposed corridor in the public utility's land use application after:

(a)  providing a notice of intent in accordance with Section 54-18-301; and

(b)  conducting the public workshops in accordance with Section 54-18-302.

(2)  If a public utility files a land use application for a high voltage power line, the public utility shall comply with the land use application requirements created by a legislative body and land use authority in accordance with Title 10, Chapter 9a, Municipal Land Use, Development, and Management Act, and Title 17, Chapter 27a, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act.

(3)  A local government may request cost information for modifications to the utility's proposed corridor in accordance with the provisions of Title 54, Chapter 14, Utility Facility Review Board Act.



Enacted by Chapter 316, 2009 General Session

